Tennessee statutes. Title 4 State Government
Part 2

Tennessee Growth Fund [Repealed]

4-17-201 — 4-17-208. [Repealed.]

Compiler's Notes. Former part 2, §4-17-201 —4-17-208 (Acts 1989, ch. 212, §§ 1-7, 9; 1995, ch. 447, § 1), concerning legislative findings, was repealed by Acts 2000, ch. 559, § 2, effective July 1, 2000. Acts 2000, ch. 559, § 3, provided that notwithstanding the provisions of §4-29-112, or any other law to the contrary, the Tennessee growth fund, created by repealed §4-17-203, terminated and ceased all activities on July 1, 2000.